Utah statutes.
31A-41-304.   Insufficient funds to satisfy judgment.

If the money in the fund is insufficient to satisfy a claim ordered to be paid under Section 31A-41-303, when sufficient money is in the fund, the department shall pay a person with an unpaid claim:

(1)  in the order that petitions related to unpaid claims are originally served on the department; and

(2)  an amount equal to the sum of:

(a)  the unpaid claim; and

(b)  interest on the unpaid claim at a rate of 5% per annum from the date the court orders payment from the fund until the day on which the claim is paid.



Amended by Chapter 342, 2011 General Session

